Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-609
Precinct refunding bonds; issuance; condition.

Whenever it shall be determined by the final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction, that any bonds purporting to have been issued by the county board of any county not under township organization for or on behalf of any precinct or de facto precinct within said county, for a lawful debt of said county payable by a tax levy upon the property in the said precinct or de facto precinct, said county board is hereby authorized to issue special precinct refunding bonds for the purpose of paying said indebtedness.

Laws 1901, c. 10, § 1, p. 61;

R.S.1913, § 432;

C.S.1922, § 349;

C.S.1929, § 11-608;

R.S.1943, § 10-609.